West Virginia, session 2025, HB3275.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 5. APPELLATE RELIEF IN THE INTERMEDIATE COURT OF APPEALS AND THE SUPREME COURT OF APPEALS. §58-5-4. Time for appeal. The time for filing a notice of appeal, perfecting an appeal, and filing related documents with the Intermediate Court of Appeals and the Supreme Court of Appeals shall be in accordance with rules promulgated by the Supreme Court of Appeals. The Clerk of the House of Delegates and the Clerk of the Senate hereby certify that the foregoing bill is correctly enrolled.  ............................................................... Clerk of the House of Delegates  		............................................................... Clerk of the Senate				                  Originated in the House of Delegates. In effect 90 days from passage.    				............................................................... Speaker of the House of Delegates  						............................................................... President of the Senate  __________   	The within is ................................................ this the........................................... Day of ..........................................................................................................., 2025.  				.............................................................								Governor Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home